District of Columbia statutes.
1-521.05

Agency affirmative action plan — Program for securing equal employment opportunity.

The plan shall further state what actions the agency is taking to secure the equal employment opportunity within the agency of the groups enumerated in § 1-521.03, and of the aging, the young, persons with disabilities, and the homosexual citizens of the District, whether such citizens be actual or potential employees of the District government.

May 6, 1976, D.C. Law 1-63, § 6, 22 DCR 6539
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 3, 59 DCR 5567
This section is referenced in § 1-521.07.
1981 Ed., § 1-511.
1973 Ed., § 1-320e.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “persons with disabilities” for “the handicapped.”
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.